District of Columbia statutes.
1-306.45

Regulations adopted to implement this part.

The Zoning Commission and all other agencies that have authority to adopt regulations to implement the housing linkage policies shall adopt regulations to implement the provisions of this part.

Apr. 10, 1984, D.C. Law 5-76, § 3, 31 DCR 1049
Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-275, § 2(a), 41 DCR 1500